Hawaii statutes.
[§183-16.5] Harvesting from state-owned
lands. All harvesting of trees on public lands shall be done in accordance
with a management plan approved by the board, and in accordance with the
provisions regarding conservation of aquatic life, wildlife, and land plants,
and the provisions regarding environmental impact statements. For any
harvesting of native trees from public lands, the department shall use existing
fire prevention and management programs and ensure that appropriate
silvicultural practices are used to encourage native biodiversity and ecosystem
processes. No native forests on public lands shall be converted to introduced
forest plantations. [L 1997, c 256, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next